Florida, session 2026, SB1630.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 105 106 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 409.979, 107 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 108 409.979âEligibility.â 109 (2)âPRE-ENROLLMENT ENROLLMENT OFFERS.âSubject to the 110 availability of funds, the Department of Elderly Affairs shall 111 make offers for enrollment to eligible individuals based on a 112 pre-enrollment list wait-list prioritization. Before making 113 enrollment offers, the agency and the Department of Elderly 114 Affairs shall determine that sufficient funds exist to support 115 additional enrollment into plans. 116 (a)âA Medicaid recipient enrolled in one of the following 117 Medicaid home and community-based services waiver programs who 118 meets the eligibility criteria established in subsection (1) is 119 eligible to participate in the long-term care managed care 120 program and must be transitioned into the long-term care managed 121 care program by January 1, 2018: 122 1.âTraumatic Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Waiver. 123 2.âAdult Cystic Fibrosis Waiver. 124 3.âProject AIDS Care Waiver. 125 (b)âThe agency shall seek federal approval to terminate the 126 Traumatic Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Waiver, the Adult Cystic 127 Fibrosis Waiver, and the Project AIDS Care Waiver once all 128 eligible Medicaid recipients have transitioned into the long 129 term care managed care program. 130 (3)âPRE-ENROLLMENT WAIT LIST, RELEASE, AND OFFER PROCESS. 131 The Department of Elderly Affairs shall maintain a statewide 132 pre-enrollment wait list for enrollment for home and community 133 based services through the long-term care managed care program. 134 (a)âThe Department of Elderly Affairs shall prioritize 135 individuals for potential enrollment for home and community 136 based services through the long-term care managed care program 137 using a frailty-based screening tool that results in a priority 138 score. The priority score is used to set an order for releasing 139 individuals from the pre-enrollment wait list for potential 140 enrollment in the long-term care managed care program. If 141 capacity is limited for individuals with identical priority 142 scores, the individual with the oldest date of placement on the 143 pre-enrollment wait list shall receive priority for release. 144 1.âPursuant to s. 430.2053, aging and disability resource 145 center personnel certified by the Department of Elderly Affairs 146 shall perform the screening for each individual requesting 147 enrollment for home and community-based services through the 148 long-term care managed care program. Aging and disability 149 resource center personnel shall place on and release from the 150 pre-enrollment lists clients eligible for the Alzheimerâs 151 Disease Initiative or the Community Care for the Elderly, Home 152 Care for the Elderly, or Statewide Medicaid Managed Care Long 153 Term Care programs. The Department of Elderly Affairs shall 154 request that the individual or the individualâs authorized 155 representative provide alternate contact names and contact 156 information. 157 2.âThe individual requesting the long-term care services, 158 or the individualâs authorized representative, must participate 159 in an initial screening or rescreening for placement on the pre 160 enrollment wait list. The screening or rescreening must be 161 completed in its entirety before placement on the pre-enrollment 162 wait list. 163 3.âPursuant to s. 430.2053, staff authorized and certified 164 by the Department of Elderly Affairs aging resource center 165 personnel shall administer rescreening annually or upon 166 notification of a significant change in an individualâs 167 circumstances for an individual with a high priority score. 168 Aging and disability resource center personnel may administer 169 rescreening annually or upon notification of a significant 170 change in an individualâs circumstances for an individual with a 171 low priority score. 172 4.âThe Department of Elderly Affairs shall adopt by rule a 173 screening tool that generates the priority score and shall make 174 publicly available on its website the specific methodology used 175 to calculate an individualâs priority score. 176 (b)âUpon completion of the screening or rescreening 177 process, the Department of Elderly Affairs shall notify the 178 individual or the individualâs authorized representative that 179 the individual has been placed on the pre-enrollment wait list, 180 unless the individual has a low priority score. The Department 181 of Elderly Affairs must maintain contact information for each 182 individual with a low priority score for purposes of any future 183 rescreening. Aging and disability resource center personnel 184 shall inform individuals with low priority scores of community 185 resources available to assist them and inform them that they may 186 contact the aging and disability resource center for a new 187 assessment at any time if they experience a change in 188 circumstances. 189 (c)âIf the Department of Elderly Affairs is unable to 190 contact the individual or the individualâs authorized 191 representative to schedule an initial screening or rescreening, 192 and documents the actions taken to make such contact, it shall 193 send a letter to the last documented address of the individual 194 or the individualâs authorized representative. The letter must 195 advise the individual or his or her authorized representative 196 that he or she must contact the Department of Elderly Affairs 197 within 30 calendar days after the date of the notice to schedule 198 a screening or rescreening and must notify the individual that 199 failure to complete the screening or rescreening will result in 200 his or her termination from the screening process and the pre 201 enrollment wait list. 202 (d)âAfter notification by the agency of available capacity, 203 the CARES program shall conduct a prerelease assessment. The 204 Department of Elderly Affairs shall release individuals from the 205 pre-enrollment wait list based on the priority scoring process 206 and prerelease assessment results. The aging and disability 207 resource center shall conduct a prerelease assessment. Upon 208 release, individuals who meet all financial and medical 209 eligibility criteria may enroll in the long-term care managed 210 care program. 211 (e)âThe Department of Elderly Affairs may terminate an 212 individualâs inclusion on the pre-enrollment wait list if the 213 individual: 214 1.âDoes not have a current priority score due to the 215 individualâs action or inaction; 216 2.âRequests to be removed from the pre-enrollment wait 217 list; 218 3.âDoes not keep an appointment to complete the rescreening 219 without scheduling another appointment and has not responded to 220 three documented attempts by the Department of Elderly Affairs 221 to contact the individual; 222 4.âReceives an offer to begin the eligibility determination 223 process for the long-term care managed care program; or 224 5.âBegins receiving services through the long-term care 225 managed care program. 226 227 An individual whose inclusion on the pre-enrollment wait list is 228 terminated must initiate a new request for placement on the pre 229 enrollment wait list, and any previous priority considerations 230 must be disregarded. 231 (f)âNotwithstanding this subsection, the following 232 individuals are afforded priority enrollment for home and 233 community-based services through the long-term care managed care 234 program and do not have to complete the screening or pre 235 enrollment list wait-list process if all other long-term care 236 managed care program eligibility requirements are met: 237 1.âAn individual who is 18, 19, or 20 years of age who has 238 a chronic debilitating disease or condition of one or more 239 physiological or organ systems which generally make the 240 individual dependent upon 24-hour-per-day medical, nursing, or 241 health supervision or intervention. 242 2.âA nursing facility resident who requests to transition 243 into the community and who has resided in a Florida-licensed 244 skilled nursing facility for at least 60 consecutive days. 245 3.âAn individual who is referred by the Department of 246 Children and Families pursuant to the Adult Protective Services 247 Act, ss. 415.101-415.113, as high risk and who is placed in an 248 assisted living facility temporarily funded by the Department of 249 Children and Families. 250 (g)âThe Department of Elderly Affairs and the agency may 251 adopt rules to implement this subsection. 252 Section 2.âSubsection (4) of section 409.983, Florida 253 Statutes, is amended to read: 254 409.983âLong-term care managed care plan payment.âIn 255 addition to the payment provisions of s. 409.968, the agency 256 shall provide payment to plans in the long-term care managed 257 care program pursuant to this section. 258 (4)âThe initial assessment of an enrolleeâs level of care 259 shall be reviewed or performed made by the Comprehensive 260 Assessment and Review for Long-Term Care Services (CARES) 261 program, which shall assign the recipient into one of the 262 following levels of care: 263 (a)âLevel of care 1 consists of recipients residing in or 264 who must be placed in a nursing home. 265 (b)âLevel of care 2 consists of recipients at imminent risk 266 of nursing home placement, as evidenced by the need for the 267 constant availability of routine medical and nursing treatment 268 and care, and who require extensive health-related care and 269 services because of mental or physical incapacitation. 270 (c)âLevel of care 3 consists of recipients at imminent risk 271 of nursing home placement, as evidenced by the need for the 272 constant availability of routine medical and nursing treatment 273 and care, who have a limited need for health-related care and 274 services and are mildly medically or physically incapacitated. 275 276 The agency shall periodically adjust payment rates to account 277 for changes in the level of care profile for each managed care 278 plan based on encounter data. 279 Section 3.âSubsection (7) of section 430.03, Florida 280 Statutes, is amended to read: 281 430.03âPurposes.âThe purposes of the Department of Elderly 282 Affairs are to: 283 (7)âOversee implementation of federally funded and state 284 funded programs and services for the stateâs elderly population. 285 The department may provide direct services for the Community 286 Care for the Elderly Program, Home Care for the Elderly Program, 287 and the Alzheimerâs Disease Initiative only in the event of a 288 state of emergency or in the event a contracted service provider 289 or subcontractor is unable to provide services. 290 Section 4.âPresent paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of 291 section 430.04, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 292 (h), a new paragraph (g) is added to that subsection, and 293 paragraph (f) of that subsection is amended to read: 294 430.04âDuties and responsibilities of the Department of 295 Elderly Affairs.âThe Department of Elderly Affairs shall: 296 (2)âBe responsible for ensuring that each area agency on 297 aging operates in a manner to ensure that the elderly of this 298 state receive the best services possible. The department shall 299 rescind designation of an area agency on aging or take 300 intermediate measures against the agency, including corrective 301 action, unannounced special monitoring, temporary assumption of 302 operation of one or more programs by the department, placement 303 on probationary status, imposing a moratorium on agency action, 304 imposing financial penalties for nonperformance, or other 305 administrative action pursuant to chapter 120, if the department 306 finds that: 307 (f)âThe agency has failed to properly determine client 308 eligibility as defined by the department. 309 (g)âThe agency has failed to or efficiently manage program 310 budgets. 311 Section 5.âSection 430.09, Florida Statutes, is created to 312 read: 313 430.09âArea agencies on aging expenditures.â 314 (1)âThe procurement of commodities or contractual services 315 by an area agency on aging and its subcontractors must comply 316 with applicable state and federal law and follow all 317 regulations. 318 (a)âArea agencies on aging shall competitively procure all 319 contracts in excess of $35,000. 320 (b)âThe department shall impose financial consequences, as 321 established by the department and incorporated into the 322 contract, for noncompliance with applicable local, state, or 323 federal law for the procurement of commodities or contractual 324 services. 325 (2)âAn administrative employee of an area agency on aging 326 may not receive a salary in excess of 150 percent of the annual 327 salary paid to the secretary of the Department of Elderly 328 Affairs from state-appropriated funds or from state-appropriated 329 federal funds. This limitation applies regardless of the number 330 of contracts an area agency on aging may execute with the 331 department. This subsection does not prohibit any party from 332 providing compensation that is not from state funds to an area 333 agency on aging administrative employee. 334 Section 6.âSubsections (3) and (5) and paragraph (c) of 335 subsection (9) of section 430.203, Florida Statutes, are amended 336 to read: 337 430.203âCommunity care for the elderly; definitions.âAs 338 used in ss. 430.201-430.207, the term: 339 (3)ââCommunity care service systemâ means a service network 340 comprising a variety of home-delivered services, day care 341 services, and other basic services, hereinafter referred to as 342 âcore services,â for functionally impaired elderly persons which 343 are provided by or through a designated single lead agency by 344 the area agency on aging. Its purpose is to provide a continuum 345 of care encompassing a full range of preventive, maintenance, 346 and restorative services for functionally impaired elderly 347 persons. 348 (5)ââCore servicesâ means a variety of home-delivered 349 services, day care services, and other basic services that may 350 be provided by several entities. Core services are those 351 services that are most needed to prevent unnecessary 352 institutionalization. The area agency on aging shall not 353 directly provide core services. 354 (9)ââLead agencyâ means an agency designated at least once 355 every 6 years by an area agency on aging as the result of a 356 competitive procurement conducted through a request for 357 proposal. 358 (c)âIn each community care service system, the lead agency 359 must be given the authority and responsibility to coordinate 360 some or all of the services, either directly or through 361 subcontracts, for functionally impaired elderly persons. These 362 services must include case management, homemaker and chore 363 services, respite care, adult day care, personal care services, 364 home-delivered meals, counseling, information and referral, and 365 emergency home repair services. The lead agency must compile 366 community care statistics and monitor, when applicable, 367 subcontracts with agencies providing core services. 368 Section 7.âSubsections (1), (4), (5), and (8) of section 369 430.204, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 370 430.204âCommunity-care-for-the-elderly core services; 371 departmental powers and duties.â 372 (1)(a)âThe department shall fund, through each area agency 373 on aging, at least one community care service system the primary 374 purpose of which is the prevention of unnecessary 375 institutionalization of functionally impaired elderly persons 376 through the provision of community-based core services. Whenever 377 feasible, an area agency on aging shall be the contracting 378 agency of preference to engage only in the planning and funding 379 of community-care-for-the-elderly core services for functionally 380 impaired elderly persons. 381 (b)âThe department shall fund, through each area agency on 382 aging in each county as defined in s. 125.011(1), more than one 383 community care service system the primary purpose of which is 384 the prevention of unnecessary institutionalization of 385 functionally impaired elderly persons through the provision of 386 community-based core services. 387 (4)âThe department or contracting agency shall contract for 388 the provision of the core services required by a community care 389 service area. The area agency on aging may not directly provide 390 core services unless the designated lead agency is unable to 391 perform its duties or in the event of a state of emergency and 392 the department approves. 393 (5)âEntities contracting to provide core services under ss. 394 430.201-430.207 must provide a minimum of 10 percent of the 395 funding necessary for the support of project operations. In-kind 396 contributions, whether materials, commodities, transportation, 397 office space, other types of facilities, or personal services, 398 and contributions of money or services from functionally 399 impaired elderly persons may be evaluated and counted as part or 400 all of the required local funding. 401 (8)âProvider agencies are responsible for the collection of 402 fees for services in accordance with rules adopted by the 403 department. Provider agencies shall assess fees for services 404 rendered in accordance with those rules. To help pay for 405 services received from community care for the elderly, a 406 functionally impaired elderly person shall be assessed a fee 407 based on an overall ability to pay. The fee to be assessed shall 408 be fixed according to a schedule established by the department 409 in cooperation with area agencies, lead agencies, and service 410 providers. 411 Section 8.âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) and paragraph (a) 412 of subsection (5) of section 430.205, Florida Statutes, are 413 amended to read: 414 430.205âCommunity care service system.â 415 (1)(a)âThe department, through the area agency on aging, 416 shall fund in each planning and service area at least one 417 community care service system that provides case management and 418 other in-home and community services as needed to help the older 419 person maintain independence and prevent or delay more costly 420 institutional care. 421 (b)âThe department shall fund, through the area agency on 422 aging in each county as defined in s. 125.011(1), more than one 423 community care service system that provides case management and 424 other in-home and community services as needed to help elderly 425 persons maintain independence and prevent or delay more costly 426 institutional care. 427 (2)âCore services and other support services may be 428 furnished by public or private agencies or organizations. Each 429 community care service system must be under the direction of a 430 lead agency that coordinates the activities of individual 431 contracting agencies providing community-care-for-the-elderly 432 services. When practicable, the activities of a community care 433 service area may be directed from a multiservice senior center, 434 as defined in s. 430.901, and coordinated with other services 435 offered therein. This subsection does not require programs in 436 existence prior to the effective date of this act to be 437 relocated. 438 (4)âA preservice and annual inservice training program for 439 community-care-for-the-elderly service providers and staff may 440 be designed and implemented to help assure the delivery of 441 quality services. The department shall specify in rules the 442 training standards and requirements for the community-care-for 443 the-elderly service providers and staff. Training must be 444 sufficient to ensure that quality services are provided to 445 clients and that appropriate skills are developed to conduct the 446 program. 447 (5)âAny person who has been classified as a functionally 448 impaired elderly person is eligible to receive community-care 449 for-the-elderly core services. 450 (a)âThose elderly persons who are determined by protective 451 investigations to be high risk vulnerable adults in need of 452 services, pursuant to s. 415.104(3)(b), or to be victims of 453 abuse, neglect, or exploitation who are in need of immediate 454 services to prevent further harm and are referred by the adult 455 protective services program, shall be given priority primary 456 consideration for receiving community-care-for-the-elderly 457 services. As used in this paragraph, the term âpriority primary 458 considerationâ means that an assessment and services must 459 commence within 72 hours after referral to the department or as 460 established in accordance with department contracts by local 461 protocols developed between department service providers and the 462 adult protective services program. Regardless, a community-care 463 for-the-elderly services provider may dispute a referral under 464 this paragraph by requesting that adult protective services 465 negotiate the referral placement of, and the services to be 466 provided to, a vulnerable adult or victim of abuse, neglect, or 467 exploitation. If an agreement cannot be reached with adult 468 protective services for modification of the referral decision, 469 the determination by adult protective services shall prevail. 470 Section 9.âSection 430.2053, Florida Statutes, is amended 471 to read: 472 430.2053âAging and disability resource centers.â 473 (1)âThe department, in consultation with the Agency for 474 Health Care Administration and the Department of Children and 475 Families, shall develop pilot projects for aging and disability 476 resource centers. 477 (2)âThe purposes of an aging and disability resource center 478 are shall be: 479 (a)âTo provide Floridaâs elders, adults with disabilities, 480 and their families with a locally focused, coordinated approach 481 to integrating information and referral for all available 482 services for persons elders with the eligibility determination 483 entities for state and federally funded long-term-care services. 484 (b)âTo provide for easier access to long-term-care services 485 by Floridaâs elders, adults with disabilities, and their 486 families by creating multiple access points to the long-term 487 care network that flow through one established entity with wide 488 community recognition. 489 (3)âThe duties of an aging and disability resource center 490 are to: 491 (a)âDevelop referral agreements with local community 492 service organizations, such as senior centers, existing elder 493 service providers, volunteer associations, and other similar 494 organizations, to better assist clients who do not need or do 495 not wish to enroll in programs funded by the department or the 496 agency. The referral agreements must also include a protocol, 497 developed and approved by the department, which provides 498 specific actions that an aging and disability resource center 499 and local community service organizations must take when a 500 person or a personâs an elder or an elderâs representative 501 seeking information on long-term-care services contacts a local 502 community service organization before prior to contacting the 503 aging and disability resource center. The protocol shall be 504 designed to ensure that persons elders and their families are 505 able to access information and services in the most efficient 506 and least cumbersome manner possible. 507 (b)âProvide an initial screening of all clients who request 508 long-term-care services to determine whether the person would be 509 most appropriately served through any combination of federally 510 funded programs, state-funded programs, locally funded or 511 community volunteer programs, or private funding for services. 512 (c)âDetermine eligibility for the programs and services 513 listed in subsection (9) for persons residing within the 514 geographic area served by the aging and disability resource 515 center and determine a priority ranking for services which is 516 based upon the potential recipientâs frailty level and 517 likelihood of institutional placement without such services. 518 (d)âPlace on and release from the pre-enrollment lists 519 clients eligible for the Alzheimerâs Disease Initiative or the 520 Community Care for the Elderly, Home Care for the Elderly, or 521 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care Long-term Care programs. 522 (e)âManage the availability of financial resources for the 523 programs and services listed in subsection (9) for persons 524 residing within the geographic area served by the aging and 525 disability resource center. 526 (f)(e)âWhen financial resources become available, refer a 527 client to the most appropriate entity to begin receiving 528 services. The aging and disability resource center shall make 529 referrals to lead agencies for service provision that ensure 530 that persons individuals who are vulnerable adults in need of 531 services pursuant to s. 415.104(3)(b), or who are victims of 532 abuse, neglect, or exploitation in need of immediate services to 533 prevent further harm and are referred by the adult protective 534 services program, are given priority primary consideration for 535 receiving community-care-for-the-elderly services in compliance 536 with the requirements of s. 430.205(5)(a) and that other 537 referrals for services are in compliance with s. 430.205(5)(b). 538 (f)âConvene a work group to advise in the planning, 539 implementation, and evaluation of the aging resource center. The 540 work group shall be comprised of representatives of local 541 service providers, Alzheimerâs Association chapters, housing 542 authorities, social service organizations, advocacy groups, 543 representatives of clients receiving services through the aging 544 resource center, and any other persons or groups as determined 545 by the department. The aging resource center, in consultation 546 with the work group, must develop annual program improvement 547 plans that shall be submitted to the department for 548 consideration. The department shall review each annual 549 improvement plan and make recommendations on how to implement 550 the components of the plan. 551 (g)âEnhance the existing area agency on aging in each 552 planning and service area by integrating, either physically or 553 virtually, the staff and services of the area agency on aging 554 with the staff of the departmentâs local CARES Medicaid 555 preadmission screening unit and a sufficient number of staff 556 from the Department of Children and Familiesâ Economic Self 557 Sufficiency Unit necessary to determine the financial 558 eligibility for all persons age 60 and older residing within the 559 area served by the aging and disability resource center that are 560 seeking Medicaid services, Supplemental Security Income, and 561 food assistance. 562 (h)âAssist clients who request long-term care services in 563 being evaluated for eligibility for enrollment in the Medicaid 564 long-term care managed care program as eligible plans become 565 available in each of the regions pursuant to s. 409.981(2). 566 (i)âProvide enrollment and coverage information to Medicaid 567 managed long-term care enrollees as qualified plans become 568 available in each of the regions pursuant to s. 409.981(2). 569 (j)âAssist Medicaid recipients enrolled in the Medicaid 570 long-term care managed care program with informally resolving 571 grievances with a managed care network and assist Medicaid 572 recipients in accessing the managed care networkâs formal 573 grievance process as eligible plans become available in each of 574 the regions defined in s. 409.981(2). 575 (4)âThe department shall select the entities to become 576 aging and disability resource centers based on each entityâs 577 readiness and ability to perform the duties listed in subsection 578 (3) and the entityâs: 579 (a)âExpertise in the needs of each target population the 580 center proposes to serve and a thorough knowledge of the 581 providers that serve these populations. 582 (b)âStrong connections to service providers, volunteer 583 agencies, and community institutions. 584 (c)âExpertise in information and referral activities. 585 (d)âKnowledge of long-term-care resources, including 586 resources designed to provide services in the least restrictive 587 setting. 588 (e)âFinancial solvency and stability. 589 (f)âAbility to collect, monitor, and analyze data in a 590 timely and accurate manner, along with systems that meet the 591 departmentâs standards. 592 (g)âCommitment to adequate staffing by qualified personnel 593 to effectively perform all functions. 594 (h)âAbility to meet all performance standards established 595 by the department. 596 (5)âThe aging and disability resource center shall have a 597 governing body which shall be the same entity described in s. 598 20.41(7), and an executive director who may be the same person 599 as described in s. 20.41(7). The governing body shall annually 600 evaluate the performance of the executive director. 601 (6)âThe aging and disability resource center may not be a 602 provider of direct services other than information and referral 603 services, outreach, and screening, and intake. The aging and 604 disability resource center must receive a waiver from the 605 department to be the provider of any other direct services. 606 (7)âThe aging and disability resource center must agree to 607 allow the department to review any financial information the 608 department determines is necessary for monitoring or reporting 609 purposes, including financial relationships. 610 (8)âThe duties and responsibilities of the community care 611 for the elderly lead agencies within each area served by an 612 aging and disability resource center shall be to: 613 (a)âDevelop strong community partnerships to maximize the 614 use of community resources for the purpose of assisting persons 615 elders to remain in their community settings for as long as it 616 is safely possible. 617 (b)âConduct comprehensive assessments of clients that have 618 been determined eligible and develop a care plan consistent with 619 established protocols that ensures that the unique needs of each 620 client are met. 621 (9)âThe services to be administered through the aging and 622 disability resource center shall include those funded by the 623 following programs: 624 (a)âCommunity care for the elderly. 625 (b)âHome care for the elderly. 626 (c)âContracted services. 627 (d)âAlzheimerâs Disease Initiative. 628 (e)âOlder Americans Act. 629 (10)âThe department shall, before prior to designation of 630 an aging and disability resource center, develop by rule 631 operational and quality assurance standards and outcome measures 632 to ensure that clients receiving services through all long-term 633 care programs administered through an aging and disability 634 resource center are receiving the appropriate care they require 635 and that contractors and subcontractors are adhering to the 636 terms of their contracts and are acting in the best interests of 637 the clients they are serving, consistent with the intent of the 638 Legislature to reduce the use of and cost of nursing home care. 639 The department shall by rule provide operating procedures for 640 aging and disability resource centers, which shall include: 641 (a)âMinimum standards for financial operation, including 642 audit procedures. 643 (b)âProcedures for monitoring and sanctioning of service 644 providers. 645 (c)âMinimum standards for technology utilized by the aging 646 and disability resource center. 647 (d)âMinimum staff requirements which shall ensure that the 648 aging and disability resource center employs sufficient quality 649 and quantity of staff to adequately meet the needs of the elders 650 residing within the area served by the aging and disability 651 resource center. 652 (e)âMinimum accessibility standards, including hours of 653 operation. 654 (f)âMinimum oversight standards for the governing body of 655 the aging and disability resource center to ensure its 656 continuous involvement in, and accountability for, all matters 657 related to the development, implementation, staffing, 658 administration, and operations of the aging and disability 659 resource center. 660 (g)âMinimum education and experience requirements for 661 executive directors and other executive staff positions of aging 662 and disability resource centers. 663 (h)âMinimum requirements regarding any executive staff 664 positions that the aging and disability resource center must 665 employ and minimum requirements that a candidate must meet in 666 order to be eligible for appointment to such positions. 667 (11)âIn an area in which the department has designated an 668 area agency on aging as an aging and disability resource center, 669 the department and the agency may shall not make payments for 670 the services listed in subsection (9) and the Statewide Medicaid 671 Managed Care Long-term Care Program Long-Term Care Community 672 Diversion Project for such persons who were not screened and 673 enrolled through the aging and disability resource center. The 674 department shall cease making payments for recipients in 675 eligible plans as eligible plans become available in each of the 676 regions defined in s. 409.981(2). 677 (12)âEach aging and disability resource center shall enter 678 into a memorandum of understanding with the department for 679 collaboration with the CARES unit staff. The memorandum of 680 understanding shall outline the staff person responsible for 681 each function and shall provide the staffing levels necessary to 682 carry out the functions of the aging and disability resource 683 center. 684 (13)âEach aging and disability resource center shall enter 685 into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of 686 Children and Families for collaboration with the Economic Self 687 Sufficiency Unit staff. The memorandum of understanding shall 688 outline which staff persons are responsible for which functions 689 and shall provide the staffing levels necessary to carry out the 690 functions of the aging and disability resource center. 691 (14)âIf any of the state activities described in this 692 section are outsourced, either in part or in whole, the contract 693 executing the outsourcing shall mandate that the contractor or 694 its subcontractors shall, either physically or virtually, 695 execute the provisions of the memorandum of understanding 696 instead of the state entity whose function the contractor or 697 subcontractor now performs. 698 (15)(a)âIn order to be eligible to begin transitioning to 699 an aging resource center, an area agency on aging board must 700 ensure that the area agency on aging which it oversees meets all 701 of the minimum requirements set by law and in rule. 702 (16)(a)âOnce an aging resource center is operational, The 703 department, in consultation with the aging and disability 704 resource center agency, may develop capitation rates for any of 705 the programs administered through the agency aging resource 706 center. Capitation rates for programs shall be based on the 707 historical cost experience of the state in providing those same 708 services to the population age 60 or older residing within each 709 area served by an aging and disability resource center. Each 710 capitated rate may vary by geographic area as determined by the 711 department. 712 (b)âThe department and the agency may determine for each 713 area served by an aging and disability resource center whether 714 it is appropriate, consistent with federal and state laws and 715 regulations, to develop and pay separate capitated rates for 716 each program administered through the aging and disability 717 resource center or to develop and pay capitated rates for 718 service packages which include more than one program or service 719 administered through the aging and disability resource center. 720 (c)âOnce capitation rates have been developed and certified 721 as actuarially sound, the department and the agency may pay 722 service providers the capitated rates for services when 723 appropriate. 724 (d)âThe department, in consultation with the agency, shall 725 annually reevaluate and recertify the capitation rates, 726 adjusting forward to account for inflation, programmatic 727 changes. 728 (16)(17)âThis section does shall not be construed to allow 729 an aging and disability resource center to restrict, manage, or 730 impede the local fundraising activities of service providers. 731 Section 10.âSection 430.503, Florida Statutes, is amended 732 to read: 733 430.503âAlzheimerâs Disease Initiative; short title fees 734 and administrative expense.â 735 (1)âSections 430.501-430.504 may be cited as the 736 âAlzheimerâs Disease Initiative.â 737 (2)âProvider agencies are responsible for the collection of 738 fees for services in accordance with rules adopted by the 739 department. Provider agencies shall assess fees for services 740 rendered in accordance with those rules. To help pay for 741 services received pursuant to the Alzheimerâs Disease 742 Initiative, a functionally impaired elderly person shall be 743 assessed a fee based on an overall ability to pay. The fee to be 744 assessed shall be fixed according to a schedule to be 745 established by the department. Services of specified value may 746 be accepted in lieu of a fee. The fee schedule shall be 747 developed in cooperation with the Alzheimerâs Disease Advisory 748 Committee, area agencies on aging, and service providers. 749 Section 11.âSubsection (3) of section 430.605, Florida 750 Statutes, is amended to read: 751 430.605âSubsidy payments.âThe department shall develop a 752 schedule of subsidy payments to be made to persons providing 753 home care, and to providers of goods and services, for certain 754 eligible elderly persons. Payments must be based on the 755 financial status of the person receiving care. Payments must 756 include, but need not be limited to: 757 (3)âWhen necessary, special supplements to provide for any 758 goods and services, including food and nutritional supplements, 759 and specialized care required to maintain the health, safety, 760 and well-being of the elderly person. Extraordinary medical, 761 dental, or pharmaceutical expenses may be paid as a special 762 supplement. 763 Section 12.âSection 430.72, Florida Statutes, is created to 764 read: 765 430.72âFlorida Alzheimerâs Center of Excellence.â 766 (1)âPURPOSE AND INTENT.â 767 (a)âThe purpose of this section is to assist and support 768 persons with Alzheimerâs disease or related forms of dementia 769 and their caregivers by connecting them with resources in their 770 communities. The Legislature intends to create a holistic care 771 model for persons with Alzheimerâs disease or related forms of 772 dementia and their caregivers to address two primary goals: 773 1.âTo allow Floridians living with Alzheimerâs disease or 774 related forms of dementia to age in place. 775 2.âTo empower family caregivers to improve their own well 776 being. 777 (b)âThe development of innovative approaches to program 778 management, staff training, and service delivery which have an 779 impact on cost-avoidance, cost-effectiveness, and program 780 efficiency is encouraged. 781 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 782 (a)ââCenterâ means the Florida Alzheimerâs Center of 783 Excellence. 784 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Elderly Affairs. 785 (3)âPOWERS AND DUTIES.â 786 (a)âThere is created within the department the Florida 787 Alzheimerâs Center of Excellence, which shall be responsible for 788 improving the quality of care for persons living with 789 Alzheimerâs disease or related forms of dementia and improved 790 quality of life for family caregivers. 791 (b)âThe center shall aim to address, at a minimum, all of 792 the following: 793 1.âEarly and accurate diagnosis. 794 2.âCaregiver health. 795 3.âImproved access to care. 796 4.âHealth care use costs. 797 5.âStrengthening a dementia-capable workforce. 798 6.âUnderreporting of Alzheimerâs disease and related forms 799 of dementia. 800 7.âDisparities in access to dementia care. 801 (c)âThe center shall provide caregivers access to services, 802 including, but not limited to, all of the following: 803 1.âCare consultation. 804 2.âSupport groups. 805 3.âEducation and training programs. 806 4.âCaregiver support services such as: 807 a.âCaregiver companions. 808 b.âCaregiver wellness programs. 809 c.âCare support teams. 810 d.âTechnology-based services. 811 e.âCoordinating or monitoring care and services. 812 f.âAssistance in obtaining diagnosis or prognosis of 813 dementia. 814 g.âAssistance in obtaining end-of-life care. 815 h.âAssistance connecting to resources for medical care. 816 i.âAssistance with planning for current or future care. 817 j.âGuidance for coping with relationship changes for 818 persons with dementia and their caregivers. 819 k.âSkills for communicating with persons with dementia. 820 l.âUnderstanding or managing behavioral symptoms of 821 dementia. 822 (d)âThe center shall work with area agencies on aging; the 823 Alzheimerâs Disease Advisory Committee; the Alzheimerâs Disease 824 Initiative, including the state-funded memory disorder clinics; 825 the Dementia Care and Cure Initiative; universities; hospitals; 826 and other available community resources to ensure full use of 827 the stateâs infrastructure. 828 (e)âAs necessary to fulfill its duties under this section, 829 the center may provide direct services or contract for the 830 provision of services. 831 (4)âELIGIBILITY FOR SERVICES.â 832 (a)âPersons seeking assistance from the center must meet 833 all of the following criteria to be eligible for services: 834 1.âAt least one person in the household is a caregiver for 835 a person who has been diagnosed with, or is suspected of having, 836 Alzheimerâs disease or a related form of dementia. 837 2.âThe caregiver or person diagnosed with, or suspected of 838 having, Alzheimerâs disease or a related form of dementia is a 839 resident of this state. 840 3.âHave the goal of providing in-home care for the person 841 who has been diagnosed with, or is suspected of having, 842 Alzheimerâs disease or a related form of dementia. 843 (b)âIf the person seeking assistance meets the criteria in 844 paragraph (a), the center may provide assistance to the 845 caregiving family, subject to the availability of funds and 846 resources. 847 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 430.901, Florida 848 Statutes, is amended to read: 849 430.901âMultiservice senior center; definition; purpose.âA 850 âmultiservice senior centerâ is: 851 (2)âAn entity that may partner with an aging and disability 852 resource center to provide for easier access to long-term care 853 services by seniors and their families who reside within the 854 local community. 855 Section 14.âSubsection (3) of section 744.2003, Florida 856 Statutes, is amended to read: 857 744.2003âRegulation of professional guardians; application; 858 bond required; educational requirements.â 859 (3)âEach professional guardian as defined in s. 744.102(17) 860 and public guardian must receive a minimum of 40 hours of 861 instruction and training. Each professional guardian must 862 receive a minimum of 30 hours of continuing education every 2 863 calendar years after the year in which the initial 40-hour 864 educational requirement is met. The required continuing 865 education must include at least 2 hours on fiduciary 866 responsibilities; 2 hours on professional ethics; 1 hour on 867 advance directives; 1 hour on Alzheimerâs disease and related 868 dementias; 3 hours on abuse, neglect, and exploitation; and 3 4 869 hours on guardianship law. The instruction and education must be 870 completed through a course approved or offered by the Office of 871 Public and Professional Guardians. The expenses incurred to 872 satisfy the educational requirements prescribed in this section 873 may not be paid with the assets of any ward. This subsection 874 does not apply to any attorney licensed to practice law in this 875 state or an institution acting as guardian under s. 744.2002(7). 876 Section 15.âSubsection (2) of section 744.2004, Florida 877 Statutes, is amended to read: 878 744.2004âComplaints; disciplinary proceedings; penalties; 879 enforcement.â 880 (2)âThe Office of Public and Professional Guardians shall 881 establish disciplinary proceedings, conduct hearings, and take 882 administrative action pursuant to chapter 120. Disciplinary 883 actions may include, but are not limited to, requiring a 884 professional guardian to participate in additional educational 885 courses provided or approved by the Office of Public and 886 Professional Guardians, imposing additional monitoring by the 887 Office of Public and Professional Guardians, imposing a fine 888 office of the guardianships to which the professional guardian 889 is appointed, and suspension or revocation of a professional 890 guardianâs registration. 891 Section 16.âParagraph (g) is added to subsection (2) of 892 section 744.20041, Florida Statutes, to read: 893 744.20041âGrounds for discipline; penalties; enforcement.â 894 (2)âWhen the Office of Public and Professional Guardians 895 finds a professional guardian guilty of violating subsection 896 (1), it may enter an order imposing one or more of the following 897 penalties: 898 (g)âRequirement that the professional guardian pay a fine, 899 not to exceed $500 per violation. 900 Section 17.âPresent subsection (2) of section 744.2104, 901 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4), and a new 902 subsection (2) and subsection (3) are added to that section, to 903 read: 904 744.2104âAccess to records by the Office of Public and 905 Professional Guardians; confidentiality.â 906 (2)âIn conducting an investigation, the Office of Public 907 and Professional Guardians may issue subpoenas duces tecum to 908 financial institutions, insurance companies, the wardâs 909 caregivers, any facility in which the ward is residing or has 910 resided, and the facilityâs professional guardians or employees 911 to compel the production of records relevant to the 912 investigation conducted by the office. 913 (3)âIf there is substantial noncompliance with a subpoena 914 duces tecum issued by the Office of Public and Professional 915 Guardians, the office may petition the court in the county in 916 which the noncompliant person resides or has her or his place of 917 business for an order requiring the person to produce such 918 records as specified in the subpoena duces tecum. 919 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 920 made by this act to section 430.204, Florida Statutes, in a 921 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 110.501, Florida 922 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 923 110.501âDefinitions.âAs used in this act: 924 (4)ââVolunteerâ means any person who, of his or her own 925 free will, provides goods or services, or conveys an interest in 926 or otherwise consents to the use of real property pursuant to 927 chapter 260, to any state department or agency, or nonprofit 928 organization, with no monetary or material compensation. A 929 person registered and serving in Older American Volunteer 930 Programs authorized by the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 931 1973, as amended (Pub. L. No. 93-113), shall also be defined as 932 a volunteer and shall incur no civil liability as provided by s. 933 768.1355. A volunteer shall be eligible for payment of volunteer 934 benefits as specified in Pub. L. No. 93-113, this section, and 935 s. 430.204. 936 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 937 made by this act to section 430.503, Florida Statutes, in a 938 reference thereto, section 430.504, Florida Statutes, is 939 reenacted to read: 940 430.504âConfidentiality of information.âInformation about 941 clients of programs created or funded under s. 430.501 or s. 942 430.503 which is received through files, reports, inspections, 943 or otherwise, by the department or by authorized departmental 944 employees, by persons who volunteer services, or by persons who 945 provide services to clients of programs created or funded under 946 s. 430.501 or s. 430.503 through contracts with the department 947 is confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1). 948 Such information may not be disclosed publicly in such a manner 949 as to identify a person who receives services under s. 430.501 950 or s. 430.503, unless that person or that personâs legal 951 guardian provides written consent. 952 Section 20.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 953 made by this act to section 430.605, Florida Statutes, in a 954 reference thereto, section 430.603, Florida Statutes, is 955 reenacted to read: 956 430.603âHome care for the elderly; rules.âThe department 957 shall by rule establish minimum standards and procedures for the 958 provision of home care for the elderly and for the approval of 959 persons seeking to provide such care. Any person who is approved 960 to provide care, goods, or services for an elderly person shall 961 be eligible for the subsidy payments described in s. 430.605. 962 However, the home care for the elderly program must be operated 963 within the funds appropriated by the Legislature. 964 Section 21.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.